Rhode Island statutes. Title 43 Statutes and Statutory Construction
Chapter 1 Action by Governor

43-1-1.
“Measure” defined.

The term “measure,” wherever used in this chapter, means any bill, resolution, or vote, except those as relate to adjournment, the organization, or conduct of either or both houses of the general assembly, and resolutions proposing amendments to the Constitution, which shall have passed both houses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 535, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 27, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 308, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

43-1-1

.

43-1-2.
Transmission of measures from governor to secretary of state.

Any measure not returned by the governor to the house in which it originated shall be transmitted by the governor to the secretary of state. Any measure approved and signed by the governor shall be transmitted as soon as signed, and any measure not signed by him or her shall be transmitted upon the expiration of the sixth day, Sundays excepted, after the measure has been presented to him or her, if the general assembly is in session, or if the general assembly has adjourned, then upon the expiration of the tenth day after the adjournment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 535, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 27, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 308, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

43-1-2

.

43-1-3.
Notice to originating house of receipt of measure by secretary of state.

Whenever the secretary of state receives from the governor, while the general assembly is in session, any measure transmitted in accordance with the provisions of §

43-1-2

, he or she, at the next daily session of the house in which the measure originated, shall notify the presiding officer of the originating house that the measure has been received, and shall state the full title of the measure and whether or not the governor has signed it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 535, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 27, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 308, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

43-1-3

.

43-1-4.
Return of disapproved measures to originating house.

Whenever the governor returns to either house any measure, which he or she does not approve, he or she shall, if the house is in session, transmit the measure to the presiding officer. But if the house to which the measure is required by law to be returned has adjourned for the day, but not for the session, at the time the governor desires to make the return, then he or she shall deliver the measure, in the case of the senate, to the secretary or clerk, and, in the case of the house of representatives, to the reading or recording clerk. Delivery of the measure to any one of the officers shall constitute a delivery to the house of which he or she is an officer. Any officer receiving any measure shall certify thereon the day and hour of its receipt and shall, at the opening of the next daily session of the house of which he or she is an officer, deliver the measure to the presiding officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 535, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 27, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 308, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

43-1-4

.

43-1-5.
Notice to general assembly of return of measure or receipt by secretary of state.

Whenever either house receives a notice from the secretary of state as required by §

43-1-3

, or receives from the governor a measure returned with the governor’s objections to the measure, the presiding officer of the house shall immediately cause the house to be notified of the notice or the return of the measure, and shall order the notice, or the objections to the measure, as the case may be, entered upon the journal of the house, and the return of the measure and the receipt of the notice shall be communicated as soon as possible to the other house.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 535, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 27, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 308, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

43-1-5

.

43-1-6.
Documents accompanying measures returned or transmitted to secretary of state.

The governor, in returning any measure to either house or transmitting any measure to the secretary of state, as required by this chapter, shall forward with the measure all papers and documents that accompanied it at the time it was originally presented to him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 535, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 27, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 308, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

43-1-6

.